src/fst/phonology.twolc
"С1:с GlottalNonNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 С1:с <=> [ Vow: | °: ] _  %> [  м ʼ | ʼ | ˮ  | 0: ц ь ] # ;
! [ Vow: | °: ] _ [ %> [ °: м ʼ #: | °: [ ʼ | ˮ ] #: | °: ц ь °: ] | о ] ;
! _  %> [ м #: | ʼ #: | ˮ #: | (0:о) ˮ м а | Ы1: ] ;
!!€# ман°С1%>°ць°
!!€# ман0с0аць0

"%{дˮØ%}:д GlottalNonNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{дˮØ%}:д <=> Vow: _ %> [ (м) ʼ # | ˮ # ]  ;
       Vow: _ %> 0: ц ь # ;
! Vow: _ [ %> [ °: м ʼ #: | °: [ ʼ | ˮ ] #: | °: ц ь °: ] | о ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>°ць°
!!€# мя00аць0

! Vow: _ %> [ °: м ʼ #: | °: ʼ #: | ˮ [ # | ң э ] | о | е | ё ] ;

 "%{йнңъʼØ%}:й GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  %{йнңъʼØ%}:й <=> о _ %> [ ʼ | м ʼ  ] ;
 
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ !LOSS
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "л:0"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  л:0 <=> _ [ ʼ: | ˮ: ] %> %{рл%}:л ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 !"v loss after m Nasal glottal"
!2014-03-24 !в:0 <=> м ʼ: %> _ #: ;
		    
		    
!2014-03-24 "ң:0 NOT мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мэңахаʼ"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  ң:0 <=> # Cns:* Vow: [ Cns:+  Vow: ]+ %> _ а: х а ʼ ;



"ь:0 with  GlottalNonNasalToZERO"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  ь:0 <=> С1: _ %> [ к: | н ] ;
      _ [%> [ а: | у: | и ]|и|а:|е] ;



!"°!=0"
!°:0 /<= %{нңʼØ%}: %> д _ Cns+ °:0 # ;
